Hawaii statutes.
[§109-6] Stadium special account. The
stadium authority is authorized to set up a special account into which shall be
deposited all receipts collected by the authority from the sale of admission
tickets for events held at the stadium, including any money deposited with the
authority by users to assure the payment of charges for the use of the
stadium. Money in the account shall be kept in a depository as defined in
section 38-1. Disbursements from the account shall be made in accordance with
procedures adopted by the authority and approved by the director of finance. [L
1978, c 73, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next